Nebraska, session 109, LB314.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB314 LB314
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 13-3103, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
13-3103 (1) Any applicant may apply to the board for state
assistance if (a) the applicant has acquired, constructed, improved, or
equipped an eligible sports arena facility, (b) the applicant has
approved a revenue bond issue or a general obligation bond issue to
acquire, construct, improve, or equip an eligible sports arena facility,
(c) the applicant has adopted a resolution authorizing the applicant to
pursue a general obligation bond issue to acquire, construct, improve, or
equip an eligible sports arena facility, (d) a building permit has been
issued within the applicant's jurisdiction for an eligible sports arena
facility that is a privately owned concert venue, or (e) a building
permit has been issued or construction has been completed within the
applicant's jurisdiction for an eligible sports arena facility that is a
privately owned sports complex or (f) each coapplicant described in
subdivision (1)(b) of section 13-3102 has adopted a resolution
authorizing either the political subdivision or the nonprofit corporation
to pursue financing or bonds to acquire, construct, improve, or equip an
eligible sports arena facility for the purposes set forth in subdivision
(4)(b) of section 13-3103.
(2) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section,
the state assistance shall only be used by the applicant to pay back
amounts expended or borrowed through one or more issues of bonds to be
expended by the applicant to acquire, construct, improve, or equip the
publicly owned eligible sports arena facility and to acquire, construct,
improve, or equip publicly owned nearby parking facilities.
(3) For an eligible sports arena facility that is a privately owned
concert venue, the state assistance shall only be used by the applicant
(a) to pay back amounts expended or borrowed through one or more issues
of bonds to be expended by the applicant to acquire, construct, improve,
or equip a nearby parking facility or (b) to promote arts and cultural
-2-

LB314 LB314
2025 2025
events which are open to or made available to the general public.
(4) For an eligible sports arena facility that is a privately owned
sports complex, the state assistance shall only be used by the applicant:
(a) To to pay back amounts expended or borrowed through one or more
issues of bonds to be expended by the applicant to acquire, construct,
improve, or equip one or more public infrastructure projects, as defined
in section 77-27,142, related to a privately owned sports complex; ,
(b) To to lease all or a portion of such privately owned sports
complex for the governmental use of the political subdivision. For
purposes of this subdivision, lease means any contractual lease agreement
between the coapplicants described in subdivision (1)(b) of section
13-3102 for the use of an eligible sports arena facility at fair market
rental value for a term not to exceed twenty years; ,
(c) To to promote sporting events which are open to or made
available to the general public; , or
(d) To to pay back amounts expended or borrowed through one or more
debt issues to be expended by the nonprofit corporation coapplicant to
acquire, construct, improve, or equip a privately owned sports complex,
subject to voter approval as provided in section 13-3110.
(5)(a) No more than ten years of funding for promotion of the arts
and cultural events shall be paid by state assistance received pursuant
to section 13-3108.
(b) No more than ten years of funding for promotion of sporting
events shall be paid by state assistance received pursuant to section
13-3108.
(c) No more than five years of funding for a sports complex located
in a city of the second class or village shall be paid by state
assistance received pursuant to section 13-3108.
(6) For any application for state assistance for a large public
stadium approved on or after July 19, 2024, up to one hundred percent of
the final cost of the project may be funded by state assistance received
-3-

LB314 LB314
2025 2025
pursuant to section 13-3108.
Sec. 2. Section 13-3106, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
13-3106 (1) After consideration of the application and the evidence,
if the board finds that the project described in the application is
eligible and that state assistance is in the best interest of the state,
the application shall be approved, except that:
(a) An an approval of an application submitted because of the
requirement in subdivision (1)(c) of section 13-3103 is a temporary
approval. If the general obligation bond issue is subsequently approved
by the voters of the political subdivision, the approval by the board
becomes permanent. If the general obligation bond issue is not approved
by such voters, the temporary approval shall become void; and .
(b) An approval of an application submitted because of the
requirement in subdivision (1)(f) of section 13-3103 is a temporary
approval. If a building permit for the eligible sports arena facility is
issued within twenty-four months of the temporary approval, the approval
by the board becomes permanent. If a building permit is not issued within
twenty-four months of the temporary approval, the temporary approval
shall become void.
(2) In determining whether state assistance is in the best interest
of the state, the board shall consider the fiscal and economic capacity
of the applicant to finance the local share of the project.
(3) A majority of the board members constitutes a quorum for the
purpose of conducting business. All actions of the board shall be by a
majority vote of all the board members, one of whom must be the Governor.
Sec. 3. Original section 13-3106, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 13-3103, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
-4-